Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5663.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 261e. (1) Not later than October 1, 2021, the The department of technology, management, and budget shall do all of the following for each information technology project exceeding that exceeds $250,000.00: (a) Establish and document a process for accounting for and monitoring of project cost that aligns with industry best practices and that includes all of the following: (i) Identification and monitoring of cost overruns. (ii) Change orders and accounting for projects that exceed 1 fiscal year. (b) Communicate process and defined roles to involved parties. (c) Ensure information technology project spending within the information technology fund is accurately tracked and accounted for, including costs for contractors, state employees, hardware, software, and maintenance. (d) Require each state agency to provide and report any additional technology project spending outside of the information technology fund to ensure that the spending is accurately tracked and accounted for, including costs for contractors, state employees, hardware, software, and maintenance. (e) Require each state agency to report on system-related contracts or projects with specific appropriations to ensure funds are only spent on the development and maintenance of that system. (2) Both of the following apply to an information technology project: (a) The project must not exceed 36 months. (b) The project must not exceed $10,000,000.00. Sec. 451a. (1) Except as provided in section sections 248 and 261e, a work project appropriation continues to be available until completion of the work or 48 months after the last day of the fiscal year in which the appropriation was originally made, whichever comes first, then the remaining balance lapses to the state fund from which it was appropriated. For work projects established before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the 48-month time period described in this subsection begins on the last day of the fiscal year in the year the amendatory act that added this section takes effect. To be designated as a work project, a work project shall must meet all of the following criteria: (a) The work project shall be Be for a specific purpose. (b) The work project shall contain Contain a specific plan to accomplish its objective. (c) The work project shall have Have an estimated completion cost. (d) The work project shall have Have an estimated completion date. (2) The director has the authority to may issue directives to lapse existing work project accounts at any time. The director shall notify each member of the senate and house appropriations committees and the fiscal agencies of work projects that the director has ordered to lapse. These directives may be disapproved by either Either of the senate or house appropriations committee within committees may disapprove a directive not later than 30 days after the date of the notification and, if disapproved within that time, shall the directive is not be effective. (3) Not later than 45 days after the conclusion of the fiscal year, the director shall notify the senate and house appropriations committees and the fiscal agencies of appropriations proposed to be designated as work projects in accordance with the definition contained in this act. These designations may be disapproved by either Either of the appropriations committee within committees may disapprove a designation not later than 30 days after the date of the notification and, if disapproved within that time, shall the designation is not be effective. The notification shall must include an estimate of the dollar amount of the funds to be designated as work projects and a description of all work projects designated in an appropriations act. (4) Not later than 120 days after the conclusion of the fiscal year, the director shall prepare and deliver to the senate and house appropriations committees and the fiscal agencies a report that summarizes current work project accounts. This The report shall must contain a listing all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. , the (b) The balance in each account. , the (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work projects. , and the (d) The funds that received these lapses.